dev/tokenisation/test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%{%"%}

LEXICON Root

Punctuation ;

LEXICON Final

0:%" # ;

LEXICON Cop

dir:dir Final ;
dur:dur Final ;
dır:dır Final ;
dür:dür Final ;
tir:tir Final ;
tur:tur Final ;
tır:tır Final ;
tür:tür Final ;
Final ; 

LEXICON Case 

niñ:niñ Cop ;
nuñ:nuñ Cop ;
nıñ:nıñ Cop ;
nüñ:nüñ Cop ;
iñ:iñ Cop ;
uñ:uñ Cop ;
ıñ:ıñ Cop ;
üñ:üñ Cop ;
ni:ni Cop ;
nu:nu Cop ;
nı:nı Cop ;
nü:nü Cop ;
ü:ü Cop ;
i:i Cop ;
u:u Cop ;
ı:ı Cop ;
a:a Cop ;
e:e Cop ;
ğa:ğa Cop ;
qa:qa Cop ;
ge:ge Cop ;
ke:ke Cop ;
ta:ta Cop ; 
da:da Cop ; 
te:te Cop ; 
de:de Cop ; 
tan:tan Cop ; 
dan:dan Cop ; 
ten:ten Cop ; 
den:den Cop ; 
nen:nen Cop ; 
Cop ;

LEXICON Poss

n:n Case ;
Case  ;

LEXICON Number

lar:lar Poss ;
ler:ler Poss ;
Poss ;

LEXICON Punctuation

%":0 Number ;
